Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1971.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2803 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2803. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Portable solar generation system" or "system." A solar photovoltaic energy system or hybrid solar photovoltaic energy system integrated with battery storage that is:(1) Limited to supplying a maximum power output of not 1234567891011121314151617 more than 1,200 watts back to the electric utility grid.(2) Designed to connect directly to the electrical system of a building or facility through a standard electrical outlet.(3) Intended primarily to offset part of the customer's electricity consumption.(4) Certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory.* * *Section 2. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2816. Portable solar generation systems.(a) Exemption from interconnection.--A customer operating a portable solar generation system under this section shall not be subject to:(1) Requirements to submit an interconnection application or enter into an interconnection agreement with an electric distribution company.(2) Inspection or technical interconnection review by the electric distribution company.(3) Any interconnection or administrative fees related to the operation of the system.(b) Limitations.--A portable solar generation system:(1) May not be eligible to participate in net metering programs established under this title.(2) Shall not be credited or compensated by the electric distribution company for any energy exported to the grid.(3) May only be used to offset on-site electricity consumption by the customer.(c) Duties of electric distribution companies.--For a customer operating a portable solar generation system, an 20250HB1971PN2530 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric distribution company may not impose any:(1) Requirements for prior approval, inspection, registration or notification from a customer.(2) Requirements for the installation of additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the system.(3) Additional fees or service charges related to the system or supplying electricity back to the electric utility grid.(d) Limitations on liability.--An electric distribution company may not be found liable for any damage or injury resulting from the operation of a portable solar generation system.(e) Safety compliance.--A customer must ensure that the system is installed and operated in accordance with manufacturer instructions and applicable local building and fire safety codes.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Authorize the interconnection of noncompliant or noncertified systems.(2) Alter net metering rights for a customer-generator provided under section 5 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.(3) Exempt systems from any applicable safety laws and regulations in this Commonwealth.(4) Prevent a local agency from enforcing general electrical safety provisions, provided that the enforcement does not require interconnection applications or electric 20250HB1971PN2530 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility approval.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1971PN2530 - 4 - 12